Illinois, session 104th, HB5499.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for grants to the Illinois Hispanic Chamber of Commerce to 8carry out shop local campaigns, multilingual public awareness 9efforts, and coordination with the State and the City of 10Chicago to rebuild foot traffic and restore confidence in 11affected business corridors. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 132026.